Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-414.06
Controlled substance; practitioner; provide information; limit
on liability or penalty.

(1) Any practitioner
who gives information to a law enforcement officer or professional board appointed pursuant to the Uniform Credentialing
Act shall not be subject to any civil, criminal, or administrative
liability or penalty for giving such information.

(2) As used in this section, unless the context otherwise
requires:

(a) Information means information
regarding unlawfully obtaining or attempting to obtain from a practitioner
(i) a controlled substance, (ii) a written or oral prescription for a controlled
substance, or (iii) the administration of a controlled substance; and

(b) Law enforcement officer has the
definition found in section 81-1401.

Laws 1988, LB 273, § 2;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 28-1438.01;

Laws 2014, LB811, § 12.

Uniform Credentialing Act, see section 38-101.